Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 2.1. Statewide Emergency Medical Services System and Services.
§ 32.1-111.4:4.
Emergency medical services personnel and equipment may in emergencies go or be sent beyond territorial limits.

Whenever the necessity arises during any actual or potential emergency resulting from fire, personal injury, or other public disaster, the emergency medical services personnel of any county, city, or town may, together with all necessary equipment, lawfully go or be sent beyond the territorial limits of such county, city, or town to any point within or without the Commonwealth to assist in meeting such emergency.

In such event, the acts performed by such fire or emergency medical services personnel and the expenditures made for such purpose by such county, city, or town shall be deemed conclusively to be for a public and governmental purpose, and all of the immunities from liability enjoyed by a county, city, or town when acting through its emergency medical services personnel for a public or governmental purpose within its territorial limits shall be enjoyed by it to the same extent when such county, city, or town is so acting, under this section or under other lawful authority, beyond its territorial limits.

Emergency medical services personnel of any county, city, or town, when acting hereunder or under other lawful authority beyond the territorial limits of such county, city, or town, shall have all the immunities from liability and exemptions from laws, ordinances, and regulations and shall have all of the pension, relief, disability, workers’ compensation, and other benefits enjoyed by them while performing their respective duties.

History.

2015, cc. 502, 503.

§ 32.1-111.4:5.
Contracts of counties, cities, and towns to furnish emergency medical services; public liability insurance to cover claims arising out of mutual aid agreements.

The governing body of any city or town may, in its discretion, authorize or require the emergency medical services agency thereof to render aid in cases of actual or potential medical emergencies occurring beyond its limits, may prescribe the conditions under which such aid may be rendered, and may enter into contracts with nearby, adjacent, or adjoining counties and cities, within or without the Commonwealth, including the District of Columbia, for rendering aid in the provision of emergency medical services in such counties, cities, or any district, or sanitary district thereof or in the District of Columbia, on such terms as may be agreed upon by such governing body and the governing body of the District of Columbia or of such counties and cities, or districts, including sanitary districts, provided that each of the parties to such agreement may contract as follows: (i) waive any and all claims against all the other parties thereto that may arise out of their activities outside their respective jurisdictions under such agreement; (ii) indemnify and save harmless the other parties to such agreement from all claims by third parties for property damage or personal injury that may arise out of the activities of the other parties to such agreement outside their respective jurisdictions under such agreement. When the emergency medical services agency of any city or town is operating under such permission or contracts on any call beyond the corporate limits of the city or town, it shall be deemed to be operating in a governmental capacity, and subject only to such liability for injuries as it would be if it were operating within the corporate limits of such city or town.

Any county, city, or town may contract with the federal or state government to provide emergency medical services to federal or state property located within or without the boundaries of the county, city, or town. In the absence of a written contract, any acts performed and all expenditures made by a county, city, or town in providing emergency medical services to property owned by the federal government shall be deemed conclusively to be for a public and governmental purpose, and all of the immunities from liability enjoyed by a county, city, or town when acting through its emergency medical services personnel for a public or governmental purpose within or without its territorial limits shall be enjoyed by it to the same extent when such county, city, or town is so acting, under the provisions of this section or under other lawful authority.Emergency medical services personnel of any county, city, or town when acting hereunder, or under other lawful authority, shall have all of the immunities from liability and exemptions from laws, ordinances, and regulations and shall have all of the pension, relief, disability, workers’ compensation, and other benefits enjoyed by them while performing their respective duties. The amount of compensation to the county, city, or town pursuant to the contract shall be a matter within the sole discretion of the governing body of the county, city, or town.

The governing body of any county adjoining or near any county, city, or town, within or without the Commonwealth, including the District of Columbia, having and maintaining emergency medical services equipment may contract with any such county, city, or town, upon such terms as such governing body may deem proper, for responding to medical emergencies in such county, city, or town and may prescribe the terms and conditions upon which such services may be provided on privately owned property in the county, city, or town and may raise funds with which to pay for such services, by levying and collecting annually, at such rates as such governing body may deem sufficient, a special tax upon the property in such county, or in any magisterial district thereof, subject to local taxation.

The governing body of any county, city, or town in the Commonwealth is authorized to procure or extend the necessary public liability insurance to cover claims arising out of mutual aid agreements executed with other counties, cities, or towns outside the Commonwealth, including the District of Columbia.

History.

2015, cc. 502, 503.

§ 32.1-111.4:6.
Establishment of an emergency medical services agency as a department of local government.

The governing body of any county, city, or town may establish an emergency medical services agency as a department of government and may designate it by any name consistent with the names of its other governmental units. The head of such emergency medical services agency shall be known as “the emergency medical services agency chief” or “EMS chief.” As many other officers and employees may be employed in such emergency medical services agency as the governing body may approve.

An emergency medical services agency established pursuant to subsection A may consist of government-employed emergency medical services personnel, volunteer emergency medical services personnel, or both. If an emergency medical services agency established pursuant to this section includes volunteer emergency medical services personnel, such volunteer emergency medical services agency shall be deemed an instrumentality of the county, city, or town and, as such, exempt from suit for damages done incident to providing emergency medical services to the county, city, or town.

The governing body of any county, city, or town may empower an emergency medical services agency established therein pursuant to this section to make bylaws to promote its objects consistent with the laws of the Commonwealth and ordinances of the county, city, or town and may provide for the compensation of the officers and employees of such agency.

All check stubs or time cards purporting to be a record of time spent on the job by emergency medical services personnel employed by an emergency medical services agency established pursuant to this section shall record all hours of employment, regardless of how spent. All check stubs or pay records purporting to show the hourly compensation of emergency medical services personnel employed by an emergency medical services agency established pursuant to this section shall show the actual hourly wage to be paid. Nothing in this section shall require the showing of such information on check stubs, time cards, or pay records; however, if such information is shown, the information shall be in compliance with this section.

History.

2015, cc. 502, 503.

§ 32.1-111.4:7.
Establishment of an emergency medical services agency as a nongovernmental entity; dissolution.

Any number of persons wishing to provide emergency medical services may establish an emergency medical services agency by (i) recording a writing stating the formation of such company, with the names of the members thereof thereto subscribed in the court of the county or city wherein such agency shall be located, (ii) complying with such local ordinances as may exist related to establishment of an emergency medical services agency, and (iii) obtaining a valid emergency medical services agency license from the Office of Emergency Medical Services together with such emergency medical services vehicle permits from the Office of Emergency Medical Services as the Office of Emergency Medical Services may require. The principal officer of such emergency medical services agency shall be known as “the emergency medical services agency chief” or “EMS chief.”

The members of an emergency medical services agency established pursuant to subsection A may make regulations for effecting its objects consistent with the laws of the Commonwealth; the ordinances of the county, city, or town; and the bylaws of the emergency medical services agency thereof.

In every county, city, or town in which an emergency medical services agency is established pursuant to this section, there shall be appointed, at such time and in such manner as the governing body of such county, city, or town in which the emergency medical services agency is located may prescribe, an emergency medical services agency chief and as many other officers of the emergency medical services agency as such governing body may direct.

An emergency medical services agency established pursuant to this section may be dissolved when the local governing body of the county, city, or town in which the emergency medical services agency is located determines that the emergency medical services agency has failed, for three months successively, to have or keep in good and serviceable condition emergency medical services vehicles and equipment and other proper implements, or when the governing body of the county, city, or town for any reason deems it advisable.

Upon dissolution of an emergency medical services agency established pursuant to this section, any property that was in the possession of such emergency medical services agency and that was purchased using public funds shall be offered to a city or county served by the emergency medical services agency to be used for the public good.

History.

2015, cc. 502, 503; 2020, c. 946.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 946 added subsection E.

§ 32.1-111.4:8.
Ordinances as to emergency medical services agencies.

The governing body of any county, city, or town in which an emergency medical services agency is established pursuant to §

32.1-111.4:6

or

32.1-111.4:7

may make such ordinances in relation to the powers and duties of emergency medical services agencies and emergency medical services agency chiefs or other officers of such emergency medical services agencies as it may deem proper.

History.

2015, cc. 502, 503.

§ 32.1-111.5.
Certification and recertification of emergency medical services providers; appeals process.

The Board shall prescribe by regulation the qualifications required for certification of emergency medical services providers, including those qualifications necessary for authorization to follow Do Not Resuscitate Orders pursuant to § 54.1-2987.1. Such regulations shall include criteria for determining whether an applicant’s relevant practical experience and didactic and clinical components of education and training completed during his service as a member of any branch of the armed forces of the United States may be accepted by the Commissioner as evidence of satisfaction of the requirements for certification.

Each person desiring certification as an emergency medical services provider shall apply to the Commissioner upon a form prescribed by the Board. Upon receipt of such application, the Commissioner shall cause the applicant to be examined or otherwise determined to be qualified for certification. When determining whether an applicant is qualified for certification, the Commissioner shall consider and may accept relevant practical experience and didactic and clinical components of education and training completed by an applicant during his service as a member of any branch of the armed forces of the United States as evidence of satisfaction of the requirements for certification. If the Commissioner determines that the applicant meets the requirements for certification as an emergency medical services provider, he shall issue a certificate to the applicant. An emergency medical services provider certificate so issued shall be valid for a period required by law or prescribed by the Board. Any certificate so issued may be suspended at any time that the Commissioner determines that the holder no longer meets the qualifications prescribed for such emergency medical services provider. The Commissioner may temporarily suspend any certificate without notice, pending a hearing or informal fact-finding conference, if the Commissioner finds that there is a substantial danger to public health or safety. When the Commissioner has temporarily suspended a certificate pending a hearing, the Commissioner shall seek an expedited hearing in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

The Board shall prescribe by regulation procedures and the qualifications required for the recertification of emergency medical services providers.

The Commissioner may issue a temporary certificate when he finds that it is in the public interest. A temporary certificate shall be valid for a period not exceeding 90 days.

The Board shall require each person who, on or after July 1, 2013, applies to be a volunteer with or employee of an emergency medical services agency to submit fingerprints and provide personal descriptive information to be forwarded along with his fingerprints through the Central Criminal Records Exchange to the Federal Bureau of Investigation, for the purpose of obtaining his criminal history record information. The Central Criminal Records Exchange shall forward the results of the state and national records search to the Commissioner or his designee, who shall be a governmental entity. If an applicant is denied employment or service as a volunteer because of information appearing on his criminal history record and the applicant disputes the information upon which the denial was based, the Central Criminal Records Exchange shall, upon written request, furnish to the applicant the procedures for obtaining a copy of the criminal history record from the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection E, an emergency medical services agency located in a locality having a local ordinance adopted in accordance with §§

15.2-1503.1

and

19.2-389

shall require an applicant for employment or to serve as a volunteer to submit fingerprints and provide personal descriptive information to be provided directly to the Central Criminal Records Exchange to be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of obtaining criminal history records information for the applicant. The Central Criminal Records Exchange shall, upon receipt of an applicant’s records or notification that no records exists, forward the results of the state and national records search to the county, city or town manager or chief law-enforcement officer for the locality in which the agency is located, or his designee, who shall be associated with a governmental entity. Upon receipt of the results of the state and national criminal history records search, the county, city or town manager or chief law-enforcement officer for the locality, or his designee, shall notify the Office of Emergency Medical Services regarding the applicant’s eligibility for employment or to serve as a volunteer. Information provided to the Office of Emergency Medical Services shall be limited to notification as to whether the applicant is eligible for employment or to serve as a volunteer in accordance with requirements related to disqualifying offenses set forth in regulations of the Board and shall not include information regarding whether the applicant has been found ineligible for employment or to serve as a volunteer due to additional exclusionary criteria established by the locality. Whenever fingerprints are submitted to both authorities and it is deemed feasible and practical by the Central Criminal Records Exchange it shall forward the results of the fingerprint based state and national records search to the county, city or town manager or chief law enforcement officer for the locality in which the agency is located, or his designee, who shall be associated with a governmental entity, and to the Office of Emergency Medical Services.

History.

1996, c. 899; 1997, c. 248; 1998, cc. 803, 854; 2008, c. 660; 2011, c. 497; 2013, cc. 72, 176, 331, 407; 2015, cc. 362, 502, 503.

Cross references.

As to dissemination of juvenile record information, see §

19.2-389.1

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 296 F, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation, funds from the $0.25 of the $4.25 for Life fee shall be provided for the payment of the initial basic level emergency medical services certification examination provided by the National Registry of Emergency Medical Technicians (NREMT). The Board of Health shall determine an allocation methodology upon recommendation by the State EMS Advisory Board to ensure that funds are available for the payment of initial NREMT testing and distributed to those individuals seeking certification as an Emergency Medical Services provider in the Commonwealth of Virginia.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 660 added the last two sentences to subsection B.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 497, in subsection A, added the last sentence; and in subsection B, added the third sentence, and in the fourth sentence, substituted “meets the requirements for certification as emergency medical services personnel” for “meets the requirements of such regulations.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 72 and 331 are identical, and substituted “emergency medical services providers” for “emergency medical care attendants” in the first sentence of subsection A; in subsection B, substituted “an emergency medical services provider” for “emergency medical services personnel” in the first and fourth sentences, substituted “emergency medical services provider” for “emergency medical services personnel” at the beginning of the fifth sentence and at the end of the sixth sentence, and deleted the former sixth sentence, which read: “The certificates may be renewed after successful reexamination of the holder.”; rewrote subsection C; and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 176 and 407 are identical, and made minor stylistic changes in subsections B and D; and added subsection E.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 362 added subsection F.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and substituted “The Board” for “The State Board of Health” in subsection E.

§ 32.1-111.5:1.
Emergency medical services personnel mental health awareness training.

Each emergency medical services agency shall develop curricula for mental health awareness training for its personnel, which shall include training regarding the following:

Understanding signs and symptoms of cumulative stress, depression, anxiety, exposure to acute and chronic trauma, compulsive behaviors, and addiction;

Combating and overcoming stigmas;

Responding appropriately to aggressive behaviors such as domestic violence and harassment; and

Accessing available mental health treatment and resources.

Any emergency medical services agency may develop the mental health awareness training curricula in conjunction with other emergency medical services agencies or emergency medical services personnel stakeholder groups or may use any training program, developed by any entity, that satisfies the criteria set forth in subsection A.

Emergency medical services personnel who receive mental health awareness training in accordance with this section shall receive appropriate continuing education credits from the Office of Emergency Medical Services.

History.

2018, cc. 456, 658.

§ 32.1-111.6.
Emergency medical services agency license; emergency medical services vehicle permits.

No person shall operate, conduct, maintain, or profess to be an emergency medical services agency without a valid license issued by the Commissioner for such emergency medical services agency and a valid permit for each emergency medical services vehicle used by such emergency medical services agency.

The Commissioner shall issue an original or renewal license for an emergency medical services agency or renewal permit for an emergency medical services vehicle that meets all requirements set forth in this article and in the regulations of the Board, upon application, on forms and according to procedures established by the Board. Licenses and permits shall be valid for a period specified by the Board, not to exceed two years.

The Commissioner may issue (i) temporary licenses for emergency medical services agencies not meeting required standards, valid for a period not to exceed 60 days, and (ii) temporary permits for emergency medical services vehicles not meeting required standards, valid for a period of 90 days from the end of the month of issue, when the public interest will be served thereby.

The issuance of a license or permit in accordance with this section shall not be construed to authorize any emergency medical services agency to operate any emergency medical services vehicle without a franchise, license, or permit in any county or municipality that has enacted an ordinance pursuant to §

32.1-111.14

making it unlawful to do so.

The word “ambulance” shall not appear on any vehicle, vessel, or aircraft that does not hold a valid permit as an emergency medical services vehicle.

History.

1996, c. 899; 2015, cc. 502, 503; 2018, c. 279.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and inserted “emergency medical services” preceding “agency” or variants and substituted “license” for “permit” or variants throughout the section; inserted “a valid permit” in subsection A; inserted “renewal permit for an” and substituted “Licenses and permits” for “Permits” in subsection B; inserted “temporary permits for” in subsection C; inserted “license or” and substituted “in accordance with this section” for “hereunder” in subsection D; and added subsection E.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 279 rewrote subsection C, which formerly read “The Commissioner may issue temporary licenses for emergency medical services agencies or temporary permits for emergency medical services vehicles not meeting required standards, valid for a period not to exceed 60 days, when the public interest will be served thereby.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

“Emergency medical services agency.” —

A locality may use Four-for-Life funds to provide funding for its local fire department pursuant to § 46.2-694.
See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Riley E. Ingram, Member, House of Delegates, 18-017, 2018 Va. AG LEXIS 15 (9/21/2018).

§ 32.1-111.6:1.
Commissioner to issue certain emergency medical services licenses or permits.

The Commissioner of Health shall issue licenses to emergency medical services agencies and permits for emergency medical services vehicles as needed to ensure compliance with federal regulations relating to reimbursement of emergency medical services vehicle transportation services pursuant to Medicare and Medicaid.

History.

2004, c. 139; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 139, cl. 1 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and substituted “issue licenses to” for “issue permits or licenses for”; inserted “permits for emergency medical services” preceding “vehicles”; and substituted “emergency medical services vehicle transportation” for “ambulance” following “of.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Billing for emergency services. —

Volunteer fire departments and rescue squads lack authority, either statutory or contractual, to bill home or automobile owners, or their insurance companies, for responding to a fire emergency. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Clarence E. “Bud” Phillips, Member, Virginia House of Delegates, 11-052, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 29 (5/13/11).

§ 32.1-111.7.
Inspections.

Each emergency medical services agency for which a license has been issued and emergency medical services vehicle for which a permit has been issued shall be inspected as often as the Commissioner deems necessary and a record thereof shall be maintained. However, no emergency medical services agency or vehicle shall receive additional inspections until every other emergency medical services agency or vehicle in the Commonwealth has been inspected, unless the additional inspections are (i) necessary to follow up on a preoperational inspection or one or more violations, (ii) required by a uniformly applied risk-based schedule established by the Department, (iii) necessary to investigate a complaint regarding the emergency medical services agency or vehicle, or (iv) otherwise deemed necessary by the Commissioner or his designee to protect the health and safety of the public. Each such emergency medical services agency or emergency medical services vehicle, its medical supplies and equipment, and the records of its maintenance and operation shall be available at all reasonable times for inspection.

History.

1996, c. 899; 2015, cc. 502, 503; 2017, c. 465.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical, and inserted “emergency medical services” preceding “agency” or “vehicle” throughout the section and substituted “for which a license has been issued and” for “and each” in the first sentence.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 465 inserted the second sentence.

§ 32.1-111.8.
Revocation and suspension of licenses and permits.

Whenever an emergency medical services agency or emergency medical services vehicle owned or operated by an emergency medical services agency is in violation of any provision of this article or any applicable regulation, the Commissioner shall have power to revoke or suspend such emergency medical services agency’s license and the permits of all emergency medical services vehicles owned or operated by the emergency medical services agency. The Commissioner may temporarily suspend any license for an emergency medical services agency or permit for an emergency medical services vehicle without notice, pending a hearing or informal fact-finding conference, if the Commissioner finds that there is a substantial danger to public health or safety. When the Commissioner has temporarily suspended a license or permit pending a hearing, the Commissioner shall seek an expedited hearing in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

History.

1996, c. 899; 2008, c. 660; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 660 added the last two sentences.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and inserted “emergency medical services” preceding “agency” throughout the section; substituted “license” for “permit” in the first and second sentences; substituted “an emergency medical services agency or permit for an” for “agencies or” in the second sentence; substituted “vehicle” for “vehicles” preceding “without”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 32.1-111.9.
Applications for variances or exemptions.

Prior to the submission of (i) an application for a variance to the Commissioner or (ii) an application for an exemption from any regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter to the Board by an emergency medical services agency that holds a valid license issued by the Commissioner, the application shall be reviewed by the governing body or chief administrative officer of the jurisdiction in which the principal office of the emergency medical services agency is located. The recommendation of the governing body or chief administrative officer of the jurisdiction regarding the variance or exemption shall be submitted with the application, and the Commissioner or Board, whichever is appropriate, shall consider that recommendation for the purposes of granting or denying the variance or exemption.

An individual who meets the definition of “emergency medical services personnel” in §

32.1-111.1

who is certified as an emergency medical services provider or is a candidate for certification by the Office of Emergency Medical Services shall not be required to submit an application for a variance or exemption to the local governing body or chief administrative officer of the jurisdiction for review, but shall submit the application for a variance or exemption to the Operational Medical Director and the emergency medical services agency chief with which he is affiliated, and shall include the recommendations of such Operational Medical Director and the emergency medical services agency chief together with the application for a variance or exemption. The recommendation of the Operational Medical Director and the emergency medical services agency chief with which the emergency medical services personnel is affiliated regarding the variance or exemption shall be submitted with the application and the Commissioner or Board, whichever is appropriate, shall consider that recommendation for the purposes of granting or denying the variance or exemption.

An emergency medical services provider who is not affiliated with an emergency medical services agency shall submit an application for a variance or exemption to the Commissioner or Board, whichever is appropriate, and the Commissioner or Board, whichever is appropriate, shall consider the application for the purposes of granting or denying the variance or exemption. The Commissioner or Board, whichever is appropriate, may require an emergency medical services provider who is not affiliated with an emergency medical services agency to submit additional case-specific endorsements or supporting documentation as part of an application for a variance or exemption.

The applicant shall have the right to appeal any denial by the Commissioner or Board of an application for a variance or exemption pursuant to the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

History.

1996, c. 899; 2008, c. 61; 2011, c. 90; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 61 substituted “an agency, entity, or provider licensed or certified by the Office of Emergency Medical Services” for “a volunteer rescue squad” and “or legal residence of the agency, entity, or provider licensed or certified by the Office of Emergency Medical Services” for “of the volunteer rescue squad” in the first sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 90 rewrote the former first paragraph, which read: “Prior to the submission to the Commissioner of Health by an agency, entity, or provider licensed or certified by the Office of Emergency Medical Services of an application for a variance, or to the Board of Health for an exemption from any regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter, the application shall be reviewed by the governing body of the jurisdiction in which the principal office or legal residence of the agency, entity, or provider licensed or certified by the Office of Emergency Medical Services is located. The recommendation of the governing body regarding the variance or exemption shall be submitted with the application; and, absent compelling reasons to the contrary, the Commissioner or Board, whichever is appropriate, shall adopt that recommendation for the purposes of granting or denying the variance or exemption”; added the subsection A designation; added subsections B and C; and designated the former last sentence as subsection D.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and rewrote the section.

§ 32.1-111.9:1.
Out-of-state emergency medical services providers.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this article or any other law or regulation to the contrary, an emergency medical services provider who holds a valid license or certification in a state that borders the Commonwealth may provide emergency medical services in the Commonwealth if (i) such services are provided at a widely attended event open to the public; (ii) due to the expected number of attendees, the anticipated need for emergency medical services at the event is beyond the capacity of local emergency medical services providers; (iii) the organizers of the event notify the Commissioner at least 10 business days prior to the event that out-of-state emergency medical services providers will be onsite at the event; and (iv) the out-of-state medical services providers provide to the Commissioner relevant licensure or certification information and any other information deemed necessary by the Commissioner.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to supersede or affect the provisions of Chapter 18 (§

32.1-371

) or any other interstate agreement regarding emergency medical services providers. Any out-of-state emergency medical services provider who holds a license or certification in a state that has entered into an interstate compact of which the Commonwealth is a member or any other interstate agreement with the Commonwealth regarding emergency medical services providers shall be governed by the provisions of such compact or agreement.

History.

2018, c. 196.

§§ 32.1-111.10,
32.1-111.11.
Repealed by Acts 2015, cc. 502 and 503, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

32.1-111.10

, pertaining to the purpose, membership, duties, reimbursement of expenses and staff support of the State Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board, derived from 1996, cc. 899, 1017; 1997, c. 446; 1999, c. 1000; 2003, cc. 836, 852, 1033; 2005, cc. 112, 506; 2012, c. 502.

Former § 32.1-111.11, pertaining to regional emergency medical services councils, derived from 1996, c. 899; 2009, cc. 222, 269; 2012, c. 418.

§ 32.1-111.12.
Virginia Rescue Squads Assistance Fund; disbursements.

For the purpose of providing financial assistance to emergency medical services organizations in the Commonwealth, of providing the requisite training for emergency medical services personnel, and of purchasing equipment needed by such organizations, there is hereby created in the Department of the Treasury a special nonreverting fund that shall be known as the Virginia Rescue Squads Assistance Fund. The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller, and any moneys remaining in such Fund at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Interest earned on such moneys shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. The Fund shall consist of any moneys appropriated for this purpose by the General Assembly and any other moneys received for such purpose by the Board. On and after July 1, 1996, any such moneys unexpended at the end of a fiscal biennium shall remain in the Fund and shall not revert to the general fund.

In accordance with regulations of the Board, the Commissioner shall disburse and expend the moneys in the Virginia Rescue Squads Assistance Fund. No moneys shall be disbursed directly to any emergency medical services organization unless such organization operates on a nonprofit basis exclusively for the benefit of the general public.

History.

1996, c. 899; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and in subsections A, deleted “rescue squads and other” preceding “emergency,” substituted “services” for “service” preceding “personnel,” deleted “rescue squads and” preceding “organizations”; in subsection B, deleted “rescue squad or other” preceding “emergency” and “squad or” preceding “organization.”

§ 32.1-111.12:01.
Financial Assistance and Review Committee; appointment; terms; duties.

For the purposes of administering the Virginia Rescue Squads Assistance Fund as provided in §

32.1-111.12

, there is hereby established the Financial Assistance and Review Committee. The Committee shall be composed of six members who shall be representatives of the regions encompassed by the emergency medical services councils and appointed by the State Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board. To ensure that each regional emergency medical services council is provided an opportunity to serve on the Committee, the Board of Health shall promulgate by regulation, after receiving the Advisory Board’s recommendation, a cycle which provides for rotating geographic representation among the councils.

Members serving on the Financial Assistance and Review Committee on January 1, 1996, shall complete their current terms of office. Thereafter, appointments shall be made for terms of three years or the unexpired portions thereof in a manner to preserve, insofar as possible, the representation of the emergency medical services councils. No member may serve more than two successive terms. The chairman shall be elected from the membership of the Committee for a term of one year and shall be eligible for reelection. The Committee shall meet at least four times annually at the call of the chairman or the Commissioner.

The Financial Assistance and Review Committee shall:

Administer the Rescue Squads Assistance Fund in accordance with the rules and regulations of the State Board of Health as shall be established for the Fund;

Review the Rescue Squads Assistance Fund grant applications from eligible emergency medical services agencies and make recommendations on the funding of such grant applications to the Commissioner of Health; and

Report biannually, after each funding cycle, the number of grant applications received, the total costs of grant applications funded, the number of grant applications denied funding, the total costs of grant applications denied funding, and the nature of the denied requests and the reasons for denying funding, to the State Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board and the Commissioner.

History.

1996, c. 998.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, c. 998, cl. 1, enacted a new section, § 32.1-114.1, which falls within the span of sections repealed by Acts 1996, c. 899. At the direction of the Code Commission, this enactment has been recodified as §

32.1-111.12:01

, and placed within the span of new sections enacted by Acts 1996, c. 899.